Utah statutes.
70A-9a-613.   Contents and form of notification before disposition of
collateral -- General.
Except in a consumer-goods transaction, the following rules apply:
(1)  The contents of a notification of disposition are sufficient if the
notification:
(a)  describes the debtor and the secured party;
(b)  describes the collateral that is the subject of the intended disposition;
(c)  states the method of intended disposition;
(d)  states that the debtor is entitled to an accounting of the unpaid
indebtedness and states the charge, if any, for an accounting; and
(e)  states the time and place of a public disposition or the time after which
any other disposition is to be made.
(2)  Whether the contents of a notification that lacks any of the information
specified in Subsection (1) are nevertheless sufficient is a question of fact.
(3)  The contents of a notification providing substantially the information
specified in Subsection (1) are sufficient, even if the notification includes:
(a)  information not specified by that subsection; or
(b)  minor errors that are not seriously misleading.
(4)  A particular phrasing of the notification is not required.
(5)  The following form of notification and the form appearing in Subsection
70A-9a-614(3), when completed, each provides sufficient information:
NOTIFICATION OF DISPOSITION OF COLLATERAL
To: [Name of debtor, obligor, or other person to which the notification is
sent]
From: [Name, address, and telephone number of secured party]
Name of Debtor(s): [Include only if debtor(s) are not an addressee]
[For a public disposition:]
We will sell [or lease or license, as applicable] the [describe collateral]
[to the highest qualified bidder] in public as follows:
Day and Date:  [Insert day and date]
Time:  [Insert time]
Place:  [Insert place]
[For a private disposition:]
We will sell [or lease or license, as applicable] the [describe collateral]
privately sometime after [day and date].
You are entitled to an accounting of the unpaid indebtedness secured by the
property that we intend to sell [or lease or license, as applicable] [for a
charge of $[Insert amount] ].  You may request an accounting by calling us at
[telephone number].
